Hawaii statutes.
§11-340 Failure to file report; filing a
substantially defective or deficient report. (a) True and accurate
reports shall be filed with the commission on or before the due dates specified
in this part. The commission may assess a fine against a person that is
required to file a report under this part if the report is not filed by the due
date or if the report is substantially defective or deficient, as determined by
the commission.

(b) The fine for not filing a report by the
due date, if assessed, shall not exceed $50 per day for the first seven days,
beginning with the day after the due date of the report, and shall not exceed
$200 per day thereafter; provided that:

(1) In aggregate, the fine shall not exceed
twenty-five per cent of the total amount of contributions or expenditures,
whichever is greater, for the period covered by the report; and

(2) The minimum fine for a report filed more than
four days after the due date, if assessed, shall be $200.

(c) Subsection (b) notwithstanding, if a candidate
committee does not file the second preliminary primary report or the
preliminary general report, or if a noncandidate committee does not file the
preliminary primary report or the preliminary general report by the due date,
the fine, if assessed, shall not exceed $300 per day; provided that:

(1) In aggregate, the fine shall not exceed
twenty-five per cent of the total amount of contributions or expenditures,
whichever is greater, for the period covered by the report; and

(2) The minimum fine, if assessed, shall be $300.

(d) If the commission determines that a report
is substantially defective or deficient, the commission shall notify the
candidate committee by first class mail that:

(1) The report is substantially defective or
deficient; and

(2) A fine may be assessed.

(e) If the corrected report is not filed with
the commission's electronic filing system on or before the fourteenth day after
the notice of defect or deficiency has been mailed, the fine, if assessed, for
a substantially defective or deficient report shall not exceed $50 per day for
the first seven days, beginning with the fifteenth day after the notice was
sent, and shall not exceed $200 per day thereafter; provided that:

(1) In aggregate, the fine shall not exceed
twenty-five per cent of the total amount of contributions or expenditures,
whichever is greater, for the period covered by the report; and

(2) The minimum fine for not filing a corrected
report more than eighteen days after the notice, if assessed, shall be $200.

(f) The commission shall publish on its
website the names of all candidate committees that have failed to:

(1) File a report; or

(2) Correct a report within the time allowed by the
commission.

(g) All fines collected under this section
shall be deposited into the general fund. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2013,
c 112, §8]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next